Missouri, session 2026, HB2893.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 115.124, 162.491, 162.492, 162.860, and 162.910, RSMo, are
repealed and five new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 115.124,
162.491, 162.492, 162.860, and 162.910, to read as follows:
115.124. 1. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, in a nonpartisan election
in any political subdivision or special district including municipal elections in any city, town,
or village with two thousand or fewer inhabitants that have adopted a proposal pursuant to
subsection 3 of this section but excluding municipal elections in any city, town, or village
with more than two thousand inhabitants, if the notice provided for in subsection 5 of section
115.127 has been published in at least one newspaper of general circulation as defined in
section 493.050 in the district, and if the number of candidates for each office in a particular
political subdivision, special district, or municipality is equal to the number of positions for
each office within the political subdivision, special district, or municipality to be filled by the
election and no ballot measure is placed on the ballot such that a particular political
subdivision will owe no proportional elections costs if an election is not held, no election
shall be held, and the candidates shall assume the responsibilities of their offices at the same
time and in the same manner as if they had been elected. If no election is held for a particular
political subdivision, special district, or municipality as provided in this section, the election
authority shall publish a notice containing the names of the candidates that shall assume the
responsibilities of office under this section. Such notice shall be published in at least one
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2893 2
newspaper of general circulation as defined in section 493.050 in such political subdivision or
district by the first of the month in which the election would have occurred, had it been
contested. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, if at any election the
number of candidates filing for a particular office exceeds the number of positions to be filled
at such election, the election authority shall hold the election as scheduled, even if a sufficient
number of candidates withdraw from such contest for that office so that the number of
candidates remaining after the filing deadline is equal to the number of positions to be filled.
2. (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, the election
authority or political subdivision responsible for the oversight of the filing of candidates in
any nonpartisan election in any political subdivision or special district shall clearly designate
where candidates shall form a line to effectuate such filings and determine the order of such
filings; except that, in the case of candidates who file a declaration of candidacy with the
election authority or political subdivision prior to 5:00 p.m. on the first day for filing, the
election authority or political subdivision may determine by random drawing the order in
which such candidates' names shall appear on the ballot. If a drawing is conducted pursuant
to this subsection, it shall be conducted so that each candidate, or candidate's representative if
the candidate filed under subsection 2 of section 115.355, may draw a number at random at
the time of filing. If such drawing is conducted, the election authority or political subdivision
shall record the number drawn with the candidate's declaration of candidacy. If such drawing
is conducted, the names of candidates filing on the first day of filing for each office on each
ballot shall be listed in ascending order of the numbers so drawn.
(2) For elections in a school district wholly located within one county, the
election authority of the county in which the school district is located and in which a
school district candidate resides shall be the only filing location for such candidate.
Such election authority shall designate the order and process for any drawing of
candidate names as provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
3. The governing body of any city, town, or village with two thousand or fewer
inhabitants may submit to the voters at any available election, a question to adopt the
provisions of subsection 1 of this section for municipal elections. If a majority of the votes
cast by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the question, then the city, town, or
village shall conduct nonpartisan municipal elections as provided in subsection 1 of this
section for all nonpartisan elections remaining in the year in which the proposal was adopted
and for the six calendar years immediately following such approval. At the end of such six-
year period, each such city, town, or village shall be prohibited from conducting such
elections in such a manner unless such a question is again adopted by the majority of
qualified voters as provided in this subsection.

HB 2893 3
162.491. 1. Directors for urban school districts, other than those districts containing
the greater part of a city of over one hundred thirty thousand inhabitants, may be nominated
by petition to be filed with the secretary of the board or, if the school district is wholly
located within one county, filed with the election authority of the county in which such
urban school district is located and in which the candidate resides, and signed by a
number of voters in the district equal to ten percent of the total number of votes cast for the
director receiving the highest number of votes cast at the next preceding biennial election,
except as provided in subsection 4 of this section.
2. This section shall not be construed as providing the sole method of nominating
candidates for the office of school director in urban school districts that do not contain the
greater part of a city of over three hundred thousand inhabitants.
3. A director for any urban school district containing a city of greater than one
hundred thirty thousand inhabitants and less than three hundred thousand inhabitants may be
nominated as an independent candidate by filing with the [secretary of the board] election
authority of the county in which such urban school district is located and in which the
candidate resides a petition signed by five hundred registered voters of such school district.
4. In any urban school district located in a county of the first classification with more
than eighty-three thousand but fewer than ninety-two thousand inhabitants and with a home
rule city with more than seventy-six thousand but fewer than ninety-one thousand inhabitants
as the county seat, a candidate for director shall file a declaration of candidacy with the
[secretary of the board] election authority of the county in which such urban school
district is located and in which the candidate resides and shall not be required to submit a
petition.
5. No candidate for election as a school board director representing a subdistrict as
provided in section 162.563 shall be required to file a declaration of candidacy as provided in
this section as the sole method of filing for candidacy.
162.492. 1. In all urban districts containing the greater part of the population of a city
which has more than three hundred thousand inhabitants, the election authority of the city in
which the greater portion of the school district lies, and of the county if the district includes
territory not within the city limits, shall serve ex officio as a redistricting commission. The
commission shall on or before November 1, 2018, divide the school district into five
subdistricts, all subdistricts being of compact and contiguous territory and as nearly equal in
the number of inhabitants as practicable and thereafter the board shall redistrict the district
into subdivisions as soon as practicable after each United States decennial census. In
establishing the subdistricts each member shall have one vote and a majority vote of the total
membership of the commission is required to make effective any action of the commission.

HB 2893 4
2. School elections for the election of directors shall be held on municipal election
days in 2014 and 2016. At the election in 2014, directors shall be elected to hold office until
2019 and until their successors are elected and qualified. At the election in 2016, directors
shall be elected until 2019 and until their successors are elected and qualified. Beginning in
2019, school elections for the election of directors shall be held on the local election date as
specified in the charter of a home rule city with more than four hundred thousand inhabitants
and located in more than one county. Beginning at the election for school directors in 2019,
the number of directors on the board shall be reduced from nine to seven. Two directors shall
be at-large directors and five directors shall represent the subdistricts, with one director from
each of the subdistricts. At the 2019 election, one of the at-large directors and the directors
from subdistricts one, three, and five shall be elected for a two-year term, and the other at-
large director and the directors from subdistricts two and four shall be elected for a four-year
term. Thereafter, all seven directors shall serve a four-year term. Directors shall serve until
the next election and until their successors, then elected, are duly qualified as provided in this
section. In addition to other qualifications prescribed by law, each member elected from a
subdistrict shall be a resident of the subdistrict from which he or she is elected. The
subdistricts shall be numbered from one to five.
3. The five candidates, one from each of the subdistricts, who receive a plurality of
the votes cast by the voters of that subdistrict and the at-large candidates receiving a plurality
of the at-large votes shall be elected. The name of [no] a candidate for nomination shall not
be printed on the ballot unless the candidate has at least sixty days prior to the election filed a
declaration of candidacy with the secretary of the board of directors or, if the school district
is wholly located within one county, filed a declaration of candidacy with the election
authority of the city in which such urban school district is located and in which the
candidate resides containing the signatures of at least two hundred fifty registered voters
who are residents of the subdistrict within which the candidate for nomination to a subdistrict
office resides, and in case of at-large candidates the signatures of at least five hundred
registered voters. The election authority of the city in which such school district is located
and in which the candidate resides shall determine the validity of all signatures on
declarations of candidacy.
4. In any election either for at-large candidates or candidates elected by the voters of
subdistricts, if there are more than two candidates, a majority of the votes are not required to
elect but the candidate having a plurality of the votes shall be elected.
5. The names of all candidates shall appear upon the ballot without party designation
and in the order of the priority of the times of filing their petitions of nomination. No
candidate may file both at large and from a subdistrict and the names of all candidates shall
appear only once on the ballot, nor may any candidate file more than one declaration of

HB 2893 5
candidacy. All declarations shall designate the candidate's residence and whether the
candidate is filing at large or from a subdistrict and the numerical designation of the
subdistrict or at-large area.
6. The provisions of all sections relating to seven-director school districts shall also
apply to and govern urban districts in cities of more than three hundred thousand inhabitants,
to the extent applicable and not in conflict with the provisions of those sections specifically
relating to such urban districts.
7. Vacancies which occur on the school board shall be filled in the manner provided
in section 162.471.
162.860. Candidates for membership on the board of education of a special school
district with a population of not more than one hundred thousand persons shall be citizens of
the United States and voters of the proposed district who have resided within the state for one
year next preceding the election and who are at least twenty-four years of age. All candidates
shall file their declarations of candidacy with the secretary of the state board of education or,
if the school district is wholly located within one county, with the election authority of
the county in which such school district is located and in which the candidate resides.
162.910. At the elections conducted pursuant to section 162.865, the voters of a
special district with a population of not more than one hundred thousand persons shall elect,
by ballot, two board members to succeed those whose terms have expired and the board
members so elected shall hold office for terms of three years and until their successors have
been elected and qualified and shall assume the duties of their offices at the first regular
meeting of the board of education held after their election. Candidates shall file their
declarations of candidacy for office of board member with the secretary of the board of
education of the special school district or, if the special school district is wholly located
within one county, with the election authority of the county in which such school district
is located and in which the candidate resides. A majority of the then qualified members of
the board of education of the special school district or the election authority of the county,
as applicable, shall certify the candidates receiving the greatest number of votes for terms of
three years each and until their successors shall have been elected and qualified, and shall
declare and certify the results of the vote cast on any question presented at the election.
✔